Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-9212
Financial responsibility; surety bond; director; powers.

(1) Prior to the issuance of a resident public adjuster license or a nonresident public adjuster license and for the duration of such license, an applicant shall secure evidence of financial responsibility in a format prescribed by the director through a surety bond. The surety bond shall be executed and issued by an insurer authorized to issue surety bonds in this state, which bond:

(a) Shall be in the minimum amount of twenty thousand dollars; and

(b) Shall not be terminated unless written notice has been filed with the director and submitted to such public adjuster at least thirty days prior to such termination.

(2) The director may request the evidence of financial responsibility at any time the director deems relevant.

(3) A public adjuster shall immediately notify the director if evidence of financial responsibility terminates or becomes impaired. The authority to act as a public adjuster shall automatically terminate if the evidence of financial responsibility terminates or becomes impaired.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 12.